Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.045

Director's duties—Dissemination of information.

The director of financial institutions or the director's designee shall:

(1) Disseminate information to the public concerning the laws regulating financial institutions of this state; and

(2) Provide assistance to members of the public in obtaining information about financial products.

[ 2008 c 3 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 3: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [February 11, 2008]." [ 2008 c 3 s 5.]